Illinois, session 104th, HB2551.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The First Responders Suicide Prevention Act is 5amended by changing Section 30 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 840/30)7    Sec. 30. First Responders Suicide Task Force. 8    (a) The First Responders Suicide Task Force is hereby 9reconstituted created to pursue recommendations to help reduce 10the risk and rates of suicide among first responders, along 11with developing a mechanism to help reduce the risk and rates 12of suicide among first responders. The Task Force shall be 13composed of the following members:14        (1) the Director of the Illinois State Police or his 15    or her designee;16        (2) the Director of Public Health or his or her 17    designee;18        (3) 2 members of the House of Representatives 19    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, 20    one of whom shall serve as co-chair;21        (4) 2 members of the House of Representatives 22    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 23    Representatives;  HB2551 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07198 BDA 17235 b1        (5) 2 members of the Senate appointed by the President 2    of the Senate, one of whom shall serve as co-chair;3        (6) 2 members of the Senate appointed by the Minority 4    Leader of the Senate;5        (7) 2 members who represent 2 different mental health 6    organizations, one appointed by the Minority Leader of the 7    House of Representatives and one appointed by the Minority 8    Leader of the Senate;9        (8) one member who represents an organization that 10    advocates on behalf of police appointed by the Speaker of 11    the House of Representatives;12        (9) one member who represents the Chicago Police 13    Department appointed by the Minority Leader of the House 14    of Representatives;15        (10) 2 members who represent organizations that 16    advocate on behalf of firefighters appointed by the 17    President of the Senate;18        (11) one member who represents the Chicago Fire 19    Department appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate; 20    and21        (12) one member who represents an organization that 22    advocates on behalf of sheriffs in the State of Illinois 23    appointed by the President of the Senate. 24        (13) one member who represents an organization that 25    provides mental health training and support for first 26    responders in the State of Illinois, appointed by the   HB2551 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07198 BDA 17235 b1    President of the Senate. 2        (14) 2 members who represent organizations that 3    advocate on behalf of public safety telecommunicators, 4    appointed by the Speaker of the House. 5    (b) Members of the Task Force shall be appointed within 30 6days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 7104th General Assembly Act and shall serve without 8compensation. The Task Force shall begin meeting no later than 930 days after all members have been appointed. The Illinois 10State Police shall provide administrative support for the Task 11Force, and if the subject matter is either sensitive or 12classified, the Task Force may hold its hearings in private.13    (c) The Task Force shall issue a final report to the 14General Assembly on or before December 31, 2026 2020 and, one 15year after the filing of its report, is dissolved. 16    (d) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2027. 17(Source: P.A. 101-375, eff. 8-16-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)